Utah statutes.
7-19-9.   Commissioner's powers not limited -- Immunity -- Rules -- Reports.

(1) This chapter does not limit any power otherwise granted to the commissioner or to any depository institution or depository institution holding company by the laws of this state.

(2)  The commissioner is not subject to any civil liability or penalty nor to any criminal prosecution for any error in judgment or discretion in any action taken or omitted by him in good faith under the provisions of this chapter.

(3)  The commissioner may promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary to implement this chapter.

(4)  By January 10 of each year, the commissioner shall report to the governor and the Legislature the nature and general terms and conditions of any supervisory acquisition or supervisory merger effectuated under the provisions of this chapter during the preceding year.

